Hawaii, session 2026, SB1309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2024-2025 are appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii to the department of the attorney general for the purpose of satisfying claims for legislative relief as to the following named persons, firms, corporations, and entities, for claims against the State or its officers or employees, for the overpayment of taxes, or for refunds, reimbursements, payments of judgments or settlements, or other liabilities, in the amounts set forth opposite their names: JUDGMENTS AGAINST THE STATE                           AMOUNT AND SETTLEMENTS OF CLAIMS: 1.   MISCELLANEOUS CLAIMS: Maui Kupono Builders                        $ 442,504.75 Sarah Ann D. Pacheco                        $       460.00 f/k/a Sarah Ann D. Taylor Kiyoji Tanimura                             $ 5,371.00 Mark Lloyd                                  $   111,733.08 Maui Kupono Builders, LLC                    $ 152,665.39 ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   712,734.22 2.   DEPARTMENT OF LAND AND NATURAL RESOURCES: Jennifer Reber v. State of Hawaii,           $   450,000.00 Civil No. 5CCV-23-0000053, Fifth Circuit       (Settlement) Brenda Osmer (Tort Claim)                   $   100,000.00 (Settlement) ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   550,000.00 3.   DEPARTMENT OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL: Billy Peter v. Anne E. Lopez,                $ 28,500.00 Civil No. 24-cv-00508 MWJS-RT, USDC            (Settlement) ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $    28,500.00 4.   DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION: B.R., M.A., and F.R. v. State of Hawaii,     $   330,000.00 Civil No. 1CCV-20-0000549, First Circuit       (Settlement) Child Evangelism Fellowship of Hawaii,       $   100,000.00 Inc. v. Hawaii State Department of             (Settlement) Education, Civil No. 24-cv-00034 MWJS-WRP, USDC Brenda Persinger, Individually and as a      $ 1,750,000.00 Personal Representative of the Estate of       (Settlement) Michael Ambrose, Deceased v. State of Hawaii, Department of Education, Civil No. 3CCV-22-0000337, First Circuit Jake Ferreira v. State of Hawaii, $ 75,000.00 Department of Education,                      (Settlement) Civil No. 1CCV-23-0000874, First Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $ 2,255,000.00 TOTAL (SECTION 1):                          $ 3,546,234.22 The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of the attorney general for the purposes of this Act. PART II SECTION 2. The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2024-2025 are appropriated out of the state highway fund for the purpose of satisfying claims for legislative relief as to the following named persons, for claims against the State or its officers or employees for payments of judgments or settlements, or other liabilities, in the amount set forth opposite their names: JUDGMENTS AGAINST THE STATE                           AMOUNT AND SETTLEMENTS OF CLAIMS: DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, HIGHWAYS DIVISION: Juan Jimmie Lee Aldeguer v.                  $ 1,075,000.00 Todd I. Sonoda,                               (Settlement) Civil No. 1CCV-21-0000052, First Circuit Estate of Bruce Perdue v.                   $   175,000.00 State of Hawaii,                              (Settlement) Civil No. 5CC131000351, Fifth Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $ 1,250,000.00 TOTAL (SECTION 2):                          $ 1,250,000.00 The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation, highways division, for the purposes of this Act. PART III SECTION 3. The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2024-2025 are appropriated out of the Judiciary funds for the purpose of satisfying claims for legislative relief as to the following named persons, for claims against the State or its officers or employees for payments of judgments or settlements, or other liabilities, in the amount set forth opposite their names: JUDGMENTS AGAINST THE STATE                           AMOUNT AND SETTLEMENTS OF CLAIMS: JUDICIARY: Leanne Rosa v. Randall G.B. Valenciano       $    90,000.00 Civil No. 23-CV-00315-JAO-WRP, USDC            (Settlement) ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $    90,000.00 TOTAL (SECTION 3):                          $    90,000.00 The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Judiciary for the purposes of this Act. PART IV SECTION 4. The sums hereinabove may be paid to the respective persons, firms, corporations, or entities for the satisfaction or settlement of the respectively identified cases, and in several amounts hereinabove set forth or in lesser amounts deemed appropriate, upon checks issued by the comptroller; provided that departments shall obtain the approval of the attorney general before payment of any claim may be made. SECTION 5. Notwithstanding the sums hereinabove stated as interest upon judgments against the State, payment of interest shall be limited to the period from the date of the judgment, if applicable, to thirty days after the effective date of this Act, as provided in section 662-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for those cases to which the statute applies. SECTION 6. All unexpended and unencumbered balances of the appropriations made in this Act as of the close of business on June 30, 2026, shall lapse. SECTION 7. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.